Utah statutes.
55-12-109.   Article 9 -- The state council.

(1)  Each member state shall create a State Council for Interstate Juvenile Supervision.

(2)  While each state may determine the membership of its own state council, its membership shall include at least one representative from the legislative, judicial, and executive branches of government, victims groups, and the compact administrator, deputy compact administrator, or designee.

(3)  Each compacting state retains the right to determine the qualifications of the compact administrator or deputy compact administrator.

(4)  Each state council shall advise and may exercise oversight and advocacy concerning that state's participation in commission activities and other duties determined by that state, including but not limited to, development of policy concerning operations and procedures of the compact within that state.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 2005 General Session

